Washington statutes.
RCW 36.26.060

Compensation—Office—Assistants, clerks, investigators, etc.

(1) The board of county commissioners shall:

(a) Fix the compensation of the public defender and of any staff appointed to assist him or her in the discharge of his or her duties: PROVIDED, That the compensation of the public defender shall not exceed that of the county prosecutor in those districts which comprise only one county;

(b) Provide office space, furniture, equipment and supplies for the use of the public defender suitable for the conduct of his or her office in the discharge of his or her duties, or provide an allowance in lieu of facilities and supplies.

(2) The public defender may appoint as many assistant attorney public defenders, clerks, investigators, stenographers and other employees as the board of county commissioners considers necessary in the discharge of his or her duties as a public defender.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4042; 1969 c 94 s 6.]